Delaware, session 153, HB193.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 7042, Title 25 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows and by redesignating accordingly: Â§ 7042. Delaware Manufactured Home Relocation Trust Fund [Expires July 1, 2029, pursuant to subsection (d) of this section]. (e) The cap on the Trust Fund is $15 million. The cap may be adjusted, eliminated, or reinstated by the Board at any time, subject to the voting requirements under Â§ 7041(c)(3) of this title. (f) If the Trust Fund ceases to exist, the funds held at the time of dissolution must be liquidated as follows: (1) Fifty percent of the total funds, on a per capita basis, to tenants of rented lots in manufactured home communities in Delaware who have occupied the lots for at least the 12 months immediately prior to the time of the dissolution. (2) Fifty percent of the total funds to landlords owning rented lots at the time of dissolution, prorated on the number of lots actually rented by the landlords for at least the 12 months immediately prior to the time of dissolution. (g) (1) a. The Board shall set a monthly assessment for deposit in the Trust Fund for each rented lot in a manufactured home community. The Board may adjust, eliminate, or reinstate the assessment, and shall notify landlords and tenants of each adjustment, elimination, or reinstatement under Board regulations. b. One-half of the monthly assessment set under paragraph (g)(1)a. of this section is the obligation of the tenant of rented lot, and Â½ one-half of the assessment is the obligation of the landlord. c. Beginning on December 11, 2019, [enactment date], the landlord portion of the monthly assessment is credited 50 cents $1.50 for each rented lot. d. Beginning on December 11, 2019, 50 cents [enactment date], $1.50 of the tenant portion of the monthly assessment for each rented lot is redirected to the Delaware Manufactured Home Owner Attorney Fund under Â§ 7046 of this title. SYNOPSIS In Chapter 70, Subchapter V of Title 25, the Manufactured Home Relocation Trust Fund was established. It is administered by a Board of Directors. The Board was directed to set a monthly assessment for deposit in the Trust Fund for each rented lot in a manufactured home community. This Act removes the cap of the Trust Fund, currently set at $15 million. This Act also raises the amount of the tenant portion of the monthly assessment to be redirected to the Delaware Manufactured Home Owner Attorney Fund from 50 cents of the tenant portion to $1.50. This Act takes effect on the date of enactment.